Oklahoma, session 2025, SB133.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 82 O.S. 2021, Section 1020.7, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 1020.7. Any person intending to use groundwater shall
make application apply to the Oklahoma Water Resources Board for an
appropriate permit as provided in Section 1020.11 of this title
before commencing any drilling for such purposes and before taking
water from any completed well heretofore drilled. Such application
SB133 HFLR Page 1
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

to t ake and use groundwater shall be on a form provided by the Board
and pursuant to the rules and regulations established by the Board.
Any person intending to use groundwater for a medical marijuana grow
facility shall present to the Board a valid medical marijuana
commercial grower license issued by the Oklahoma Medical Marijuana
Authority pursuant to Section 427.14 of Title 63 of the Oklahoma
Statutes.
The application heretofore filed with the Board shall be used in
granting permits for existing wells and the Board shall publish the
notice of the hearing thereon.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2025.
SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.

COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON ENERGY AND NATURAL RESOURCES
OVERSIGHT, dated 04/16/2025 - DO PASS, As Amended.







SB133 HFLR Page 2
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.